Georgia, session 2025_26, SB326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 30 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to handicapped persons, is
amended by adding a new chapter to read as follows:
S. B. 326
- 1 -

LC 52 0824
"CHAPTER 11
30-11-1.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the 'Georgia Support Service Provider
Act of 2025.'
30-11-2.
The purpose of this chapter is to:
(1) Establish a program to provide, arrange, and fund support service providers to assist
blind and deaf-blind individuals in navigating employment and higher education
opportunities;
(2) Reduce barriers to workforce participation and postsecondary education for blind and
deaf-blind individuals; and
(3) Enhance economic independence and social inclusion of blind and deaf-blind
individuals by offering personal and real-time employment assistance and higher
education assistance.
30-11-3.
As used in this chapter, the term:
(1) 'Advisory committee' means the Support Service Provider Program Advisory
Committee created under Code Section 30-11-4.
(2) 'Agency' means the Georgia Vocational Rehabilitation Agency.
(3) 'Blind' means having vision that is 20/200 or less in the best corrected eye or having
vision that subtends an angle of not greater than 20 degrees in the best corrected eye.
(4) 'Deaf-blind' means having a combined loss of vision and hearing which prevents the
individual's vision or hearing from being used as a primary source for accessing
information.
S. B. 326
- 2 -

LC 52 0824
(5) 'Employment assistance' means assisting a blind or deaf-blind individual with:
(A) Job application support, including assisting with job searches, application
completion, resume writing, and interview preparation;
(B) Workplace orientation, including helping a blind or deaf-blind employee navigate
new workplaces, understand spatial layouts, and access assistive technology; and
(C) Transportation coordination, including facilitating accessible transportation to and
from job interviews and employment sites.
(6) 'Higher education assistance' means assisting a blind or deaf-blind individual with:
(A) College enrollment support, including assisting with admissions, financial aid
applications, and orientation programs;
(B) Classroom and campus navigation, including providing guidance to locate
classrooms, libraries, and student resources; and
(C) Academic support, including helping blind and deaf-blind students access adaptive
technology, note-taking services, and tutoring accommodations.
(7) 'Program' means the Support Service Provider Program created under this chapter.
(8) 'Support service provider' means an individual who is specially trained to provide
employment assistance and higher education assistance to blind and deaf-blind
individuals.
30-11-4.
(a) There is created a Support Service Provider Program Advisory Committee to provide
recommendations and guidance to the agency in establishing, implementing, and
administering the program established pursuant to this chapter.
(b) The advisory committee shall consist of nine members appointed by the Governor who
shall be blind or deaf-blind individuals, disability advocates, business leaders or employers,
representatives of higher education institutions, and support service providers. The
Governor shall designate one member as chairperson.
S. B. 326
- 3 -

LC 52 0824
(c) The term of each member of the advisory committee shall be for two years, provided
that of the members first appointed, five shall be appointed for terms of one year and four
for terms of two years. Whenever any vacancy in membership of the advisory committee
occurs, the Governor shall appoint a qualified person to fill the unexpired term. Each
member shall serve until a successor is appointed and qualified. No member shall serve
more than two consecutive terms.
(d) The advisory committee shall meet at the call of the chairperson and shall meet at least
quarterly. No later than January 1, 2026, the advisory committee shall provide initial
recommendations to the agency.
(e) Members of the advisory committee shall serve as such without compensation but shall
receive the same expense allowance as that received by members of the General Assembly
and the same mileage allowance for the use of a personal car or a travel allowance of actual
transportation cost if traveling by public carrier as that received by all other state officials
and employees.
(f) The agency shall provide reasonable administrative support to the advisory committee.
30-11-5.
(a) The agency is authorized to establish and administer the Support Service Provider
Program to provide, arrange, or fund support service providers to provide employment
assistance and higher education assistance to blind and deaf-blind individuals residing in
this state.
(b) The agency, in consultation with the advisory committee, shall establish standards and
criteria for the program, support services, support service providers, and applicants to
receive support services.
(c) No later than January 1, 2027, the program shall be fully operational.
S. B. 326
- 4 -

LC 52 0824
(d) The agency shall contract with qualified nonprofit organizations and independent
support service providers to deliver employment assistance and higher education assistance
to blind and deaf-blind individuals through the program.
(e) Any resident of this state who is blind or deaf-blind and seeking employment or
postsecondary education shall be eligible for support services; provided, however, that
priority shall be given to individuals from low-income backgrounds and residing in
underserved rural areas.
30-11-6.
(a) The agency shall be authorized to accept donations, contributions, and gifts and to
receive, hold, and use grants, devises, and bequests of real, personal, and mixed property
on behalf of the state to enable the agency to carry out the functions and purposes of this
chapter.
100 (b) The agency shall be authorized to pursue federal funding opportunities and
101 collaborations with private entities, nonprofit organizations, and philanthropic
102 organizations to fund the program established pursuant to this chapter.
103 30-11-7.
104 Beginning December 1, 2027, the agency shall prepare and submit to the Governor, the
105 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives an annual report
106 evaluating the effectiveness of the program established pursuant to this chapter. Such
107 report shall include the number of individuals served, employment and education
108 outcomes, budget expenditures and financial accountability, and recommendations for
109 program expansion or improvement. The agency shall publish such reports on its website
110 in a prominent location."
S. B. 326
- 5 -

LC 52 0824
111 SECTION 2.
112 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
113 without such approval.
114 SECTION 3.
115 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 326
- 6 -